Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Chapter 4 Medical Assistance and Services

Cross references. —

As to pioneer home and retirement center, see chapter 8 of title 25.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Paying for Nursing Home Care: Medicaid and Planned Poverty,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 471 (1990).

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal prosecution or disciplinary action against medical practitioner for fraud in connection with claims under medicaid, medicare or similar welfare program for providing medical services, 50 ALR3d 549.

Limitation on right of chiropractors and osteopathic physicians to participate in public medical welfare programs, 8 ALR4th 1056.

Liability of nursing home for violating statutory duty to notify third party concerning patient's medical condition, 46 ALR5th 821.

Right to maintain action under Hill-Burton Act (42 U.S.C. § 291 et seq.) to compel hospital to provide services to persons unable to pay therefor, 11 ALR Fed 683.

Use of medical-vocational guidelines (20 CFR Part 404, subpart P, appendix 2) in determining disability of social security benefits claimant,
60 ALR Fed 796.